test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuul_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tūļ: # Noun 214 'eng /est tuul/fin' - full paradigm
     tūļ+N+Sg+Nom: tūļ
     tūļ+N+Sg+Gen: tūl
     tūļ+N+Sg+Par: tūldõ
     tūļ+N+Sg+Dat: tūlõn
     tūļ+N+Sg+Ins: tūlkõks
     tūļ+N+Sg+Ill: tūlõ
     tūļ+N+Sg+Ela: tūlstõ
     tūļ+N+Pl+Nom: tūld
     tūļ+N+Pl+Gen: tūld
     tūļ+N+Pl+Par: tūļi
     tūļ+N+Pl+Dat: tūldõn
     tūļ+N+Pl+Ins: tūldkõks
     tūļ+N+Pl+Ill: tūļiž
     tūļ+N+Pl+Ela: tūļšti
